data/dictionaries/apertium/apertium-ell.ell.dix
    <pardef n="μ/ήνας__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ήνας</l><r>ήνας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήνα</l><r>ήνας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήνα</l><r>ήνας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήνα</l><r>ήνας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήνες</l><r>ήνας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήνες</l><r>ήνας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηνών</l><r>ήνας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήνες</l><r>ήνας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="συνα/ίνεση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίνεση</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνεση</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνεσης</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινέσεως</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνεση</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινέσεις</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινέσεις</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινέσεων</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινέσεις</l><r>ίνεση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ί/νδιο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>νδιο</l><r>νδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>νδιο</l><r>νδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινδου</l><r>νδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>νδιο</l><r>νδιο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ρουμπ/ίνι__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ίνι</l><r>ίνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνι</l><r>ίνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινιού</l><r>ίνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνι</l><r>ίνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνια</l><r>ίνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνια</l><r>ίνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ινιών</l><r>ίνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίνια</l><r>ίνι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ρ/ίγα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίγα</l><r>ίγα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίγα</l><r>ίγα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίγας</l><r>ίγα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίγα</l><r>ίγα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίγες</l><r>ίγα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίγες</l><r>ίγα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιγών</l><r>ίγα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίγες</l><r>ίγα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="γ/ένος__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ένος</l><r>ένος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένος</l><r>ένος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένους</l><r>ένος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένος</l><r>ένος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένη</l><r>ένος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένη</l><r>ένος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ενών</l><r>ένος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ένη</l><r>ένος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="αγκιν/άρα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>άρα</l><r>άρα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρα</l><r>άρα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρας</l><r>άρα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρα</l><r>άρα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρες</l><r>άρα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρες</l><r>άρα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρών</l><r>άρα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρες</l><r>άρα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="προσκ/ύνημα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ύνημα</l><r>ύνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύνημα</l><r>ύνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υνήματος</l><r>ύνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύνημα</l><r>ύνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υνήματα</l><r>ύνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υνήματα</l><r>ύνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υνημάτων</l><r>ύνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υνήματα</l><r>ύνημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ρ/ύγχος__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ύγχος</l><r>ύγχος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγχος</l><r>ύγχος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγχους</l><r>ύγχος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγχος</l><r>ύγχος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγχη</l><r>ύγχος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγχη</l><r>ύγχος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υγχών</l><r>ύγχος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύγχη</l><r>ύγχος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="μελιτζ/άνα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>άνα</l><r>άνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνα</l><r>άνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνας</l><r>άνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνα</l><r>άνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνες</l><r>άνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνες</l><r>άνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ανών</l><r>άνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άνες</l><r>άνα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ίνδιο"><i>ί</i><par n="ί/νδιο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αίγα"><i>α</i><par n="ρ/ίγα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="αγκινάρα"><i>αγκιν</i><par n="αγκιν/άρα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="γένος"><i>γ</i><par n="γ/ένος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μήνας"><i>μ</i><par n="μ/ήνας__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μανταρίνι"><i>μανταρ</i><par n="ρουμπ/ίνι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="μελιτζάνα"><i>μελιτζ</i><par n="μελιτζ/άνα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="προσκύνημα"><i>προσκ</i><par n="προσκ/ύνημα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ρίγα"><i>ρ</i><par n="ρ/ίγα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ρουμπίνι"><i>ρουμπ</i><par n="ρουμπ/ίνι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ρύγχος"><i>ρ</i><par n="ρ/ύγχος__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="συναίνεση"><i>συνα</i><par n="συνα/ίνεση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="τσουγκράνα"><i>τσουγκρ</i><par n="μελιτζ/άνα__n_f"/></e>
